Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-468
Aquaculturist; activities authorized.

Any resident or nonresident who qualifies as an aquaculturist, after securing an aquaculture permit as provided in section 37-465, may establish and maintain, upon private lands, ponds or tanks for the culture and propagation of aquatic organisms, subject to the restrictions imposed by the Game Law.

Laws 1929, c. 112, VII, § 2, p. 438;

C.S.1929, § 37-702;

R.S.1943, § 37-702;

Laws 1947, c. 139, § 1, p. 385;

Laws 1967, c. 216, § 16, p. 590;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 44;

Laws 1993, LB 830, § 8;

Laws 1994, LB 1165, § 14;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-702;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 178;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 51.